ava_pn.lexd
LEXICON NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ

<np><top><sg><attr>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-ROSSIJA

<np><top><sg><attr>: # ; 
<np><top><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><top><sg><erg>:>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><gen>:>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><dat>:>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg>:>л LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN

<np><top><sg><attr>: # ; 
<np><top><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><top><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><gen>:>{a}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg>:>{a}л LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK

<np><top><sg><attr>: # ; 
<np><top><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
#<np><top><sg><erg>: CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><gen>:и>{a}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg><dat>:и>{a}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><sg>:и>{a}л LOC-CASES ;


LEXICON NP-TOP-PL

<np><top><pl><attr>: # ; 
<np><top><pl><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><top><pl><gen>:>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><pl><dat>:>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><top><pl>:>ял LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-JA

<sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<sg><erg>:->ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg><gen>:->ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg><dat>:->ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg>:->ял LOC-CASES ;

<sg><erg>:>ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg><gen>:>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg><dat>:>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg>:>ял LOC-CASES ;# Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG

<sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<sg><erg>:->алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg><gen>:->алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg><dat>:->алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<sg>:->ал LOC-CASES ;

<sg><erg>:>алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg><gen>:>алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg><dat>:>алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<sg>:>ал LOC-CASES ;# Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-A-PL

<pl><nom>:->ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<pl><erg>:->аз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<pl><gen>:->азул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<pl><dat>:->азе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<pl>:->аз LOC-CASES ;

<pl><nom>:>ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<pl><erg>:>аз CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<pl><gen>:>азул CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<pl><dat>:>азе CLIT-SUBST-I ; # Dir/LR
<pl>:>аз LOC-CASES ;# Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACSH

<np><top>: NP-ACR-COMMON-JA ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-SSSR

<np><top>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;

LEXICON NP-AL-NKVD

<np><al>: NP-ACR-COMMON-JA ;

LEXICON NP-AL-KPSS

<np><al>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;

LEXICON NP-AL-GES

<np><al>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;
<np><al>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-PL ;

LEXICON NP-AL-EDINAJA-ROSSIJA 

<np><al><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><al><erg>:>лъ CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><al><gen>:>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><al><dat>:>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><al>:>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-AL

<np><al><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><al><erg>:>{a}лъ CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><al><gen>:>{a}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><al><dat>:>{a}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><al>:>{a}л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-INIT

<np><ant><mf><attr>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-DAKU

<np><ant><m><attr>: # ; 
<np><ant><m><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><ant><m><erg>:>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m><gen>:>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m><dat>:>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m>:> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

<np><ant><m><attr>: # ; 
<np><ant><m><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><ant><m><erg>:>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m><gen>:>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m><dat>:>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><m>:>и LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT

<np><ant><f><attr>: # ; 
<np><ant><f><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><ant><f><erg>:>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><f><gen>:>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA

<np><ant><f><attr>: # ; 
<np><ant><f><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><ant><f><erg>:>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><f><gen>:>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><ant><f><dat>:>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-DZE

<np><cog><mf><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><erg>:>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><gen>:>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><dat>:>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg>:> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OJ

<np><cog><mf><sg><nom>:й CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><erg>:>яс CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><gen>:>ясул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><dat>:>ясе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg>:>яс LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IAN

<np><cog><mf><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><erg>:>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><gen>:>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg><dat>:>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><mf><sg>:>и LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

<np><cog><m><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><erg>:>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><gen>:>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><dat>:>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg>:>и LOC-CASES ; 

<np><cog><f><sg><nom>:а CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><erg>:а>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><gen>:а>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><dat>:а>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg>:а>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

ич<np><pat><m><sg><attr>:ич # ; 
ич<np><pat><m><sg><nom>:ич # ; 
ич<np><pat><m><sg><erg>:ичас # ; 
ич<np><pat><m><sg><gen>:ичасул # ; 
ич<np><pat><m><sg><dat>:ичасе # ; 

на<np><pat><f><sg><attr>:на # ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

NP-PAT-VICH ; 

<np><cog><m><sg><nom>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><erg>:>ас CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><gen>:>асул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg><gen>:>асе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><m><sg>:>ас LOC-CASES ; 

<np><cog><f><sg><nom>:а CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><erg>:а>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><gen>:а>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg><dat>:а>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
<np><cog><f><sg>:а>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON ProperNouns 


Анкара:Анкара NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Баку:Баку NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Басказул улка:Басказул улка NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Краснодар:Краснодар NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Ереван:Ереван NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Пекин:Пекин NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Украина:Украина NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Белгород:Белгород NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Иран:Иран NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Афгъанистан:Афгъанистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Башкортостан:Башкортостан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Татарстан:Татарстан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Дагъистан:Дагъистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Дагъистан:Дагестан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Брест:Брест NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Тайланд:Тайланд NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ГӀарабистан:ГӀарабистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Махӏачхъала:Махӏачхъала NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Туркменистан:Туркменистан   NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Узбекистан:Узбекистан  NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хиндистан:Хиндистан  NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хъазахъистан:Хъазахъистан  NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Татаристан:Татаристан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хабашистан:Хабашистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Чеэраб Меэр:Чеэраб Меэр NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Нью-Мексико:Нью-Мексико NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Нью-Йорк:Нью-Йорк NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Нью-Джерси:Нью-Джерси NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Аризона:Аризона  NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Юта:Юта NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Колорадо:Колорадо NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Манитоба:Манитоба NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Аваристан:Аваристан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Истамбул:Истамбул NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Исрапил:Исрапил NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Ставропол:Ставропол NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Стамбул:Стамбул NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Азербайжан:Азербайжан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Азербайжан:Азербижан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Азербайжан:Азербейджан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub

Къазан:Къазан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Къазан:Казань NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Казан:Казан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub

Избербаш:Избербаш NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Дербент:Дербент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Дагъогни:Дагъогни NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Казбек:Казбек NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Гъарабудагъкент:Гъарабудагъкент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Ленинкент:Ленинкент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Ташкент:Ташкент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""


Северияб Кавказ:Северияб Кавказ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Кавказ:Кавказ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ЦӀамухъ:ЦӀамухъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "Армения"
Эрменистан:Эрменистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "Армения"
Аляска:Аляска NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" 

ГӀусманюрт:ГӀусманюрт NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гъизилюрт:Гъизилюрт NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хасавюрт:Хасавюрт NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Ростов:Ростов NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Югалъулаб Осетия:Югалъулаб Осетия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Европа:Европа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Европа:Европа NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Америка:Америка NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Америка:Америка NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Канада:Канада NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Канада:Канада NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Шри-Ланка:Шри-Ланка NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Закатала:Закатала NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Билкан:Билкан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Пакистан:Пакистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Тажикистан:Тажикистан  NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Тажикистан:Таджикистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Тажикистан:ТӀажикистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Чачанистан:Чачанистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гуржистан:Гуржистан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

ЦӀунтӏа:ЦӀунтӏа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

#Дербент:Дербент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
#Дербендалъул

Мадинат:Мадинат NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Москва:Москва NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Санкт-Петербург:Санкт-Петербург NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Екатеринбург:Екатеринбург NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Нижний Новгород:Нижний Новгород NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Самара:Самара NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Доналда Ростов:Доналда Ростов NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Уфа:Уфа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Тува:Тува NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Азия:Азия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Нигерия:Нигерия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Эритрея:Эритрея NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Корея:Корея NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Шималияб Корея:Шималияб Корея NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""

Алания:Алания NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Осетия:Осетия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Швеция:Швеция NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Ингушетия:Ингушетия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Адыгея:Адыгея NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""

Кабардино-Балкария:Кабардино-Балкария NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Болгария:Болгария NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Евразия:Евразия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""

Якутия:Якутия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Грузия:Грузия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Авария:Авария NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Латвия:Латвия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Буртия:Буртия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Бутан:Бутан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гренландия:Гренландия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Индия:Индия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Испания:Испания NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Италия:Италия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Киргизия:Киргизия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Монголия:Монголия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Россия:Россия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Сирия:Сирия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Туркия:Туркея NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Туркия:Туркия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Турция:Турция NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Чехословакия:Чехословакия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Финляндия:Финляндия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Франция:Франция NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Черкесия:Черкесия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Карачаево-Черкесия:Карачаево-Черкесия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Норвегия:Норвегия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Эфиопия:Эфиопия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Япония:Япония NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Алмания:Алмания NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
ГӀарабия:ГӀарабия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Сагӏудиязул ГӀарабия:Сагӏудиязул ГӀарабия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Эстония:Эстония NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Абхазия:Абхазия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Аравия:Аравия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Туркмения:Туркмения NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Германия:Германия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # "" # Use/Sub
Ялова:Ялова NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Ялова:Ялова NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # "" # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
Чачан Республика:Чачан Республика NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Лаос:Лаос NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Иордания:Иордания NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Замбезия:Замбезия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Бразилия:Бразилия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Колумбия:Колумбия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
ГӀарабия:ГӀарабия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Ягьудия:Ягьудия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Шафия:Шафия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Черногория:Черногория NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Полония:Полония NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Лубия:Лубия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Кения:Кения NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Белорусия:Белорусия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Белорус:Белорус NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Буртия:Буртия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Венесуэла:Венесуэла NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
